src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Finnish (exp. omorfi) language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON Persons
+V+1sg:en   #   ;
+V+2sg:et   #   ;
+V+3sg:e    #   ;
+V+1pl:ien  #   ;
+V+2pl:iet  #   ;
+V+3pl:iet  #   ;
+V+inf:0    #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
